Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 584	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 584	bre	p/453	.		#present
SFX 584	bre	ps/453	.		#present
SFX 584	bre	bem/453	.		#present
SFX 584	bre	beu/453	.		#present
SFX 584	bre	ben/453	.		#present

SFX 585	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 585	er	ea	.		#imperfecte
SFX 585	er	ees	.		#imperfecte
SFX 585	er	éem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 585	er	éeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 585	er	een	.		#imperfecte

SFX 586	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 586	er	aça/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 586	er	aces/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 586	er	açam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 586	er	açau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 586	er	acen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 587	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 587	er	aig/453	.		#present
SFX 587	er	as/453	.		#present
SFX 587	er	a/453	.		#present
SFX 587	er	em/453	.		#present
SFX 587	er	eu/453	.		#present
SFX 587	er	an/453	.		#present

SFX 588	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 588	er	aria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 588	er	aries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 588	er	aríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 588	er	aríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 588	er	arien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 589	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 589	er	aré	.		#futur
SFX 589	er	aràs	.		#futur
SFX 589	er	arà	.		#futur
SFX 589	er	arem	.		#futur
SFX 589	er	areu	.		#futur
SFX 589	er	aran	.		#futur

SFX 590	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 590	er	eya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 590	er	eyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 590	er	éyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 590	er	éyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 590	er	eyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 591	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 591	er	iu	.		#perfecte
SFX 591	er	eres	.		#perfecte
SFX 591	er	eu	.		#perfecte
SFX 591	er	érem	.		#perfecte
SFX 591	er	éreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 591	er	eren	.		#perfecte

SFX 592	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 592	er	er/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 592	er	es/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 592	er	aça/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 592	er	açam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 592	er	açau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 592	er	acen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 593	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 593	ir	c/453	.		#present
SFX 593	ir	s/453	.		#present
SFX 593	ir	0/453	.		#present
SFX 593	ir	im/453	.		#present
SFX 593	ir	iu/453	.		#present
SFX 593	ir	en/453	.		#present

SFX 594	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 594	ir	eya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 594	ir	eyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 594	ir	éyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 594	ir	éyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 594	ir	eyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 595	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 595	ir	ir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 595	ir	0/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 595	ir	ga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 595	ir	gam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 595	ir	gau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 595	ir	guen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 596	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 596	ollir	ullguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 596	ollir	ullgueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 596	ollir	ullguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 596	ollir	ullguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 596	ollir	ullgueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 597	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 597	r	r/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 597	r	m/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 597	r	u/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 598	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 598	r	r/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 598	r	gues/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 598	r	ga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 598	r	gam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 598	r	gau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 598	r	guen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 599	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 599	r	r/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 599	r	m/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 599	r	u/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 600	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 600	ure	xquí	.		#perfecte
SFX 600	ure	xqueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 600	ure	xqué	.		#perfecte
SFX 600	ure	xquérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 600	ure	xquéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 600	ure	xqueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 601	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 601	ure	ure/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 601	ure	u/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 601	ure	xca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 601	ure	xcam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 601	ure	xcau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 601	ure	xquen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 602	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 602	ure	xc/453	.		#present
SFX 602	ure	us/453	.		#present
SFX 602	ure	u/453	.		#present
SFX 602	ure	vim/453	.		#present
SFX 602	ure	viu/453	.		#present
SFX 602	ure	uen/453	.		#present

SFX 603	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 603	ure	xquera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 603	ure	xqueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 603	ure	xquérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 603	ure	xquéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 603	ure	xqueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 604	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 604	ure	xca/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 604	ure	xques/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 604	ure	xcam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 604	ure	xcau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 604	ure	xquen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 605	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 605	éixer	eixc/453	.		#present
SFX 605	éixer	éixer/453	.		#present

SFX 606	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 606	émer	emera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 606	émer	emeres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 606	émer	emérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 606	émer	eméreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 606	émer	emeren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 607	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 607	émer	emeria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 607	émer	emeries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 607	émer	emeríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 607	émer	emeríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 607	émer	emerien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 608	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 608	émer	emeré	.		#futur
SFX 608	émer	emeràs	.		#futur
SFX 608	émer	emerà	.		#futur
SFX 608	émer	emerem	.		#futur
SFX 608	émer	emereu	.		#futur
SFX 608	émer	emeran	.		#futur

SFX 609	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 609	émer	emia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 609	émer	emies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 609	émer	emíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 609	émer	emíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 609	émer	emien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 610	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 610	émer	émer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 610	émer	em/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 610	émer	ema/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 610	émer	emam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 610	émer	emau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 610	émer	emen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 611	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 611	émer	ema/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 611	émer	emes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 611	émer	emam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 611	émer	emau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 611	émer	emen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 612	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 612	émer	em/453	.		#present
SFX 612	émer	ems/453	.		#present
SFX 612	émer	emem/453	.		#present
SFX 612	émer	emeu/453	.		#present
SFX 612	émer	emen/453	.		#present

SFX 613	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 613	émer	emí	.		#perfecte
SFX 613	émer	emeres	.		#perfecte
SFX 613	émer	emé	.		#perfecte
SFX 613	émer	emérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 613	émer	eméreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 613	émer	emeren	.		#perfecte

SFX 614	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 614	bre	bre/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 614	bre	p/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 614	bre	ba/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 614	bre	bam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 614	bre	bau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 614	bre	ben/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 615	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 615	entir	entir/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 615	entir	intam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 615	entir	intau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 616	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 616	er	aç/453	.		#present
SFX 616	er	er/453	.		#present
