Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
alçaprémer/451,606,607,608,609,610,611,612,613,1074
aparéixer/451,518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,605,1068
apercebre/451,481,482,503,504,505,506,584,614,1060
assentir/451,455,456,467,468,469,516,521,560,615,676,828,918,1054
brunyir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,574,593,595,828,1054
cabre/481,482,503,504,505,584,849,850,1060
collir/455,456,467,468,562,563,564,596,828,1054
concebre/481,482,503,504,505,506,584,614,1060
contradir/455,456,467,544,565,575,594,598,623,828,1063
contrafer/558,585,586,587,588,589,590,591,592,616,1063
conviure/481,482,512,600,601,602,603,604,1073
desencollir/455,456,467,468,562,563,564,596,828,1054
desfer/558,585,586,587,588,589,590,591,592,597,599,616,1063
desjunyir/455,456,467,468,469,516,574,593,595,758,828,1054
desviure/481,482,512,600,601,602,603,604,1122
dissentir/456,467,468,469,516,521,560,615,676,817,828,918,1030,1054
encollir/451,455,456,467,468,562,563,564,596,828,1054
enjunyir/451,455,456,467,468,469,516,574,593,595,828,939,997,1054
escollir/451,455,456,467,468,562,563,564,596,828,1054
esprémer/451,606,607,608,609,610,611,612,613,1074
fer/558,585,586,587,588,589,590,591,592,597,599,616,1057,1063
grunyir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,574,593,595,828,1054
interdir/451,455,456,467,544,565,575,594,598,623,661,828,1063
malviure/481,482,512,600,601,602,603,604,1073
munyir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,574,593,595,828,1054
percebre/451,481,482,503,504,505,506,584,614,1060
preconcebre/451,481,482,503,504,505,506,584,614,1060
prémer/451,606,607,608,609,610,611,612,613,1074
pudir/451,455,456,467,468,469,516,597,599,824,828,888,889,1054
rarefer/558,585,586,587,588,589,590,591,592,597,599,616,1063
rebre/481,482,503,504,505,506,584,614,1060
recollir/455,456,467,468,562,563,564,596,828,1054
reeixir/455,456,467,468,469,553,554,555,556,557,597,599,828,1054,1057
refer/558,585,586,587,588,589,590,591,592,597,599,616,1063
reprémer/606,607,608,609,610,611,612,613,1074
satisfer/558,585,586,587,588,589,590,591,592,927,928,929,930,931,932,933,1063
sentir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,560,615,676,828,918,1054,1057
sobreviure/481,482,512,600,601,602,603,604,1073
témer/606,607,608,609,610,611,612,613,1074
viure/481,482,512,600,601,602,603,604,1073
